Virginia statutes. Title 62.1. Waters of the State, Ports and Harbors.
Article 2. Control Board Generally.
§ 62.1-44.15:1.
Limitation on power to require construction of sewerage systems or sewage or other waste treatment works; ammonia criteria.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to empower the Board to require the Commonwealth, or any political subdivision thereof, or any authority created under the provisions of §

15.2-5102

or §§

15.2-5152

through

15.2-5158

, to construct any sewerage system, sewage treatment works, or water treatment plant waste treatment works or system necessary to (i) upgrade the present level of treatment in existing systems or works to abate existing pollution of state waters or (ii) expand a system or works to accommodate additional growth, unless the Board shall have previously committed itself to provide financial assistance from federal and state funds equal to the maximum amount provided for under § 8 or other applicable sections of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, P.L. 84-660, as amended, or unless the Commonwealth or political subdivision or authority voluntarily agrees, or is directed by the Board with the concurrence of the Governor, to proceed with such construction, subject to reimbursement under § 8 or other applicable sections of such federal act.The foregoing restriction shall not apply to those cases where existing sewerage systems or sewage or other waste treatment works cease to perform in accordance with their approved certificate requirements.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to empower the Board to require the Commonwealth, or any political subdivision thereof, to upgrade the level of treatment in any works to a level more stringent than that required by applicable provisions of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, P.L. 84-660, as amended.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to empower the Board to adopt the 2013 proposed Aquatic Life Ambient Water Quality Criteria for Ammonia of the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency unless the Board includes in such adoption a phased implementation program consistent with the federal Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. § 1251 et seq.) that includes (i) consideration of the relative priority of ammonia criteria and other water quality and water infrastructure needs of the local community, (ii) mechanisms to coordinate implementation timing with grant funding mechanisms pursuant to § 10.1-2131 and other treatment facility expansion and upgrade plans, (iii) appropriate long-term compliance schedules for facilities or classes of facilities utilizing multiple permit cycles, and (iv) appropriate mechanisms to address affordability limitations and financial hardship situations remaining notwithstanding the other elements of the phased implementation program.

History.

1971, Ex. Sess., cc. 197, 245; 1973, c. 179; 1975, c. 279; 1981, c. 262; 2018, cc. 510, 511.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2018, cc. 510 and 511, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Environmental Quality shall (i) identify any other states that have adopted the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency 2013 Aquatic Life Ambient Water Quality Criteria for Ammonia (the Criteria) as of July 1, 2018; (ii) identify the specific procedures and practices for the implementation of the Criteria by the General Assembly or the State Water Control Board (the Board) that will both minimize the impact of the Criteria on Virginia sewerage systems or other treatment works and be permissible under the federal Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. § 1251 et seq.), including an opportunity to request consideration of alternative effluent limitations based on a demonstration by the permittee, acceptable to the Board, of the lack of appreciable harm from the discharge of ammonia to aquatic life that is present in the vicinity of the discharge or which should be present but for the discharge; and (iii) report its findings to the Chairmen of the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources, the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources, the Senate Finance Committee, and the House Appropriations Committee no later than November 1, 2018. The completion of such identification and reporting shall not preclude the Board from proceeding to adopt the Criteria.”

Acts 2018, cc. 510 and 511, cl. 3 provides: “That the inclusion of the phased implementation program required by this act in the current regulatory action of the State Water Control Board (the Board) on the adoption of the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency 2013 Aquatic Life Ambient Water Quality Criteria for Ammonia shall not require reproposal of the current action and shall not be considered changes with substantial impact under §

2.2-4007.06

of the Code of Virginia if the Department of Environmental Quality provides a 60-day public comment period on the proposed phased implementation program before it is presented to the Board for adoption.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 510 and 511 are identical, and redesignated the existing provisions as subsections A and B, added subsection C, and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia administrative law for the year 1974-1975, see 61 Va. L. Rev. 1632 (1975).

§ 62.1-44.15:1.1.
Special orders; penalties.

The Board is authorized to issue special orders in compliance with the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) requiring that an owner file with the Board a plan to abate, control, prevent, remove, or contain any substantial and imminent threat to public health or the environment that is reasonably likely to occur if such facility ceases operations.
Such plan shall also include a demonstration of financial capability to implement the plan. Financial capability may be demonstrated by the establishment of an escrow account, the creation of a trust fund to be maintained within the Board, submission of a bond, corporate guarantee based upon audited financial statements, or such other instruments as the Board may deem appropriate.
The Board may require that such plan and instruments be updated as appropriate. The Board shall give due consideration to any plan submitted by the owner in accordance with §§ 10.1-1309.1, 10.1-1410, and 10.1-1428, in determining the necessity for and suitability of any plan submitted under this section.

For the purposes of this section, “ceases operation” means to cease conducting the normal operation of a facility which is regulated under this chapter under circumstances where it would be reasonable to expect that such operation will not be resumed by the owner at the facility.
The term shall not include the sale or transfer of a facility in the ordinary course of business or a permit transfer in accordance with Board regulations.

Any person who ceases operations and who knowingly and willfully fails to implement a closure plan or to provide adequate funds for implementation of such plan shall, if such failure results in a significant harm or an imminent and substantial threat of significant harm to human health or the environment, be liable to the Commonwealth and any political subdivision thereof for the costs incurred in abating, controlling, preventing, removing, or containing such harm or threat.

Any person who ceases operations and who knowingly and willfully fails to implement a closure plan or to provide adequate funds for implementation of such plan shall, if such failure results in a significant harm or an imminent and substantial threat of significant harm to human health or the environment, be guilty of a Class 4 felony.

History.

1991, c. 702.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 4 felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

§ 62.1-44.15:1.2.
Lake level contingency plans.

Any Virginia Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit issued for a surface water impoundment whose primary purpose is to provide cooling water to power generators shall include a lake level contingency plan to allow specific reductions in the flow required to be released when the water level above the dam drops below designated levels due to drought conditions. The plan shall take into account and minimize any adverse effects of any release reduction requirements on beneficial uses, as defined in §

62.1-10

, within the impoundment, and on downstream users. The reduction in release amounts required by a lake level contingency plan shall not be implemented to the extent they result in an adverse impact to (i) the ability to meet water quality standards based upon permitted discharge amounts, (ii) the ability to provide adequate water supplies for consumptive purposes such as drinking water and fire protection, and (iii) fish and wildlife resources. In the event there is an imminent threat of such an adverse impact, the permit holder and the Department of Environmental Quality shall be notified. Upon such notification, the permit holder may increase release amounts as specified in the permit for up to forty-eight hours or until such time as the Department of Environmental Quality determines whether or not the increase in release amounts is necessary. This section shall not apply to any such facility that addresses releases and flow requirements during drought conditions in a Virginia Water Protection Permit.

History.

2000, cc. 103, 119; 2001, c. 116.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 116 divided the former first sentence into the present first and second sentences; in the present first sentence, substituted “Pollutant” for “Pollution”; in the present second sentence, substituted “The plan” for “and such plans,” and inserted “beneficial uses, as defined in §

62.1-10

, within the impoundment, and on”; and inserted the present third, fourth and fifth sentences.

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia environmental law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 799 (2000).

§ 62.1-44.15:2.
Extraordinary hardship program.

There is hereby established a supplemental program of financial assistance for the construction of water quality control facilities by political subdivisions of the Commonwealth. All sums appropriated for this program shall be apportioned by the Board among the political subdivisions qualifying, to provide financial assistance in addition to that otherwise available to help relieve extraordinary hardship in local funding of the construction of such facilities.

History.

1975, c. 339.

§ 62.1-44.15:3.
When application for permit considered complete.

No application submitted to the Board for a new individual Virginia Pollutant Discharge Elimination permit authorizing a new discharge of sewage, industrial wastes, or other wastes shall be considered complete unless it contains notification from the county, city, or town in which the discharge is to take place that the location and operation of the discharging facility are consistent with applicable ordinances adopted pursuant to Chapter 22 (§

15.2-2200

et seq.) of Title 15.2. The county, city, or town shall inform in writing the applicant and the Board of the discharging facility’s compliance or noncompliance not more than thirty days from receipt by the chief administrative officer, or his agent, of a request from the applicant. Should the county, city, or town fail to provide such written notification within thirty days, the requirement for such notification is waived. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to any discharge for which a valid certificate had been issued prior to March 10, 2000.

No application for a certificate to discharge sewage into or adjacent to state waters from a privately owned wastewater treatment system serving fifty or more residences shall be considered complete unless the applicant has provided the Executive Director with notification from the State Corporation Commission that the applicant is incorporated in the Commonwealth and is in compliance with all regulations and relevant orders of the State Corporation Commission.

History.

1987, c. 132; 1990, c. 14; 1993, c. 606; 1994, cc. 262, 549; 1995, c. 256; 2000, cc. 19, 98; 2001, c. 492.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by c. 19, effective July 1, 2000, and c. 98, effective March 10, 2000, are virtually identical, and added subsection A and designated the former paragraph as subsection B. The amendment by c. 98 referred to “the effective date of this act” at the end of subsection A, which was March 10, 2000, while the amendment by c. 19 referred to “July 1, 2000.” The section is set out above as directed by the Code Commission.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 492, in subsection A, substituted “submitted to the Board for a new individual Virginia Pollutant Discharge Elimination permit authorizing a new discharge of sewage, industrial wastes, or other wastes” for “for a certificate to discharge sewage into any water impoundment located in the state,” and deleted “the governing body of” following “notification from” in the first sentence, and in the second and third sentences substituted “county, city, or town” for
“governing body” in two places, and substituted “thirty days” for “forty-five days” in two places.

Law Review.

As to local veto of water permits, see 22 U. Rich. L. Rev. 587 (1988).

§ 62.1-44.15:4.
Notification of local governments and property owners.

Upon determining that there has been a violation of a regulation promulgated under this chapter and such violation poses an imminent threat to the health, safety or welfare of the public, the Executive Director shall immediately notify the chief administrative officer of any potentially affected local government. Neither the Executive Director, the Commonwealth, nor any employee of the Commonwealth shall be liable for a failure to provide, or a delay in providing, the notification required by this subsection.

Upon receiving a nomination of a waterway or segment of a waterway for designation as an exceptional state water pursuant to the Board’s antidegradation policy, as required by 40 C.F.R. § 131.12, the Board shall notify each locality in which the waterway or segment lies and shall make a good faith effort to provide notice to impacted riparian property owners. The written notice shall include, at a minimum: (i) a description of the location of the waterway or segment; (ii) the procedures and criteria for designation as well as the impact of designation; (iii) the name of the person making the nomination; and (iv) the name of a contact person at the Department of Environmental Quality who is knowledgeable about the nomination and the waterway or segment. Notice to property owners shall be based on names and addresses taken from local tax rolls. Such names and addresses shall be provided by the Commissioners of the Revenue or the tax assessor’s office of the affected jurisdictions upon request by the Board. After receipt of the notice of the nomination localities shall be provided sixty days to comment on the consistency of the nomination with the locality’s comprehensive plan.

Upon determining that a waterway or any segment of a waterway does not meet its water quality standard use designation as set out in the Board’s regulations and as required by § 1313 (d) of the federal Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. § 1251 et seq.) and 40 C.F.R. § 130.7 (b), the Board shall notify each locality in which the waterway or segment lies. The written notification shall include, at a minimum: (i) a description of the reasons the waters do not meet the water quality standard including specific parameters and criteria not met; (ii) a layman’s description of the location of the waters; (iii) the known sources of the pollution; and (iv) the name of a contact person at the Department of Environmental Quality who is knowledgeable about the failure of the waterway or segment to meet the standards. After receipt of the notification, local governments shall have thirty days to comment.

Upon receipt of an application for the issuance of a new or modified permit other than those for agricultural production or aquacultural production activities, the Board shall notify, in writing, the locality wherein the discharge does or is proposed to take place of, at a minimum: (i) the name of the applicant; (ii) the nature of the application and proposed discharge; (iii) the availability and timing of any comment period; and (iv) upon request, any other information known to, or in the possession of, the Board or the Department regarding the applicant not required to be held confidential by this chapter. The Board shall make a good faith effort to provide this same notice and information to (i) each locality and riparian property owner to a distance one quarter mile downstream and one quarter mile upstream or to the fall line whichever is closer on tidal waters, and (ii) each locality and riparian property owner to a distance one half mile downstream on nontidal waters. Distances shall be measured from the point, or proposed point, of discharge. If the receiving river, at the point or proposed point of discharge, is two miles wide or greater, the riparian property owners on the opposite shore need not be notified. Notice to property owners shall be based on names and addresses taken from local tax rolls. Such names and addresses shall be provided by the Commissioners of the Revenue or the tax assessor’s office of the affected jurisdictions upon request by the Board.

Upon the commencement of public notice of an enforcement action pursuant to this chapter, the Board shall notify, in writing, the locality where the alleged offense has or is taking place of: (i) the name of the alleged violator; (ii) the facts of the alleged violation; (iii) the statutory remedies for the alleged violation; (iv) the availability and timing of any comment period; and (v) the name of a contact person at the Department of Environmental Quality who is knowledgeable about the alleged violation.

The comment periods established in subsections B and C shall in no way impact a locality’s ability to comment during any additional comment periods established by the Board.

History.

1988, c. 434; 1996, c. 160; 1997, c. 581.

Law Review.

For an article reviewing key environmental developments at the federal and state levels during the period from June 1996 to June 1998, see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1217 (1998).

§ 62.1-44.15:4.1.
Listing and notice of confirmed oil releases and discharges.

The Department of Environmental Quality shall notify the Department of Health of any confirmed release or discharge of oil, as defined in §§

62.1-44.34:8

and

62.1-44.34:14

, respectively, which requires that a site characterization investigation be conducted. Monthly notification to the Department of Health shall occur within one week from the last day of the previous month and shall include information on the location of the site of each confirmed release or discharge during the monthly reporting period. The reporting of such information shall begin for releases or discharges of oil that have been confirmed on and after January 1, 1999.

History.

1998, c. 795.

Effective date.

This section became effective January 1, 1999.

§ 62.1-44.15:5.
Repealed by Acts 2007, c. 659, cl. 3.

Cross references.

For current provisions as to Virginia water protection permits, see Article 2.2 (§

62.1-44.15:20

et seq.) of Chapter 3.1 of Title 62.1.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2007, c. 659, cl. 2, provides: “That permits and regulations issued under the authority of §

62.1-44.15:5

of the Code of Virginia shall remain in effect until their specified expiration dates or until they are otherwise amended, modified, repealed, or revoked.”

§ 62.1-44.15:5.01.
Coordinated review of water resources projects.

Applications for water resources projects that require an individual Virginia Water Protection Permit and a Virginia Marine Resources permit under §

28.2-1205

shall be submitted and processed through a joint application and review process.

The Director and the Commissioner of the Virginia Marine Resources Commission, in consultation with the Virginia Institute of Marine Science, the Department of Wildlife Resources, the Department of Historic Resources, the Department of Health, the Department of Conservation and Recreation, the Virginia Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services, and any other appropriate or interested state agency, shall coordinate the joint review process to ensure the orderly evaluation of projects requiring both permits.

The joint review process shall include, but not be limited to, provisions to ensure that: (i) the initial application for the project shall be advertised simultaneously by the Department of Environmental Quality and the Virginia Marine Resources Commission; (ii) project reviews shall be completed by all state agencies that have been asked to review and provide comments within 45 days of project notification by the Department of Environmental Quality and the Virginia Marine Resources Commission; (iii) the Board and the Virginia Marine Resources Commission shall coordinate permit issuance and, to the extent practicable, shall take action on the permit application no later than one year after the agencies have received complete applications; (iv) to the extent practicable, the Board and the Virginia Marine Resources Commission shall take action concurrently, but no more than six months apart; and (v) upon taking its final action on each permit, the Board and the Virginia Marine Resources Commission shall provide each other with notification of their actions and any and all supporting information, including any background materials or exhibits used in the application. Any state agency asked to review and provide comments in accordance with clause (ii) shall provide such comments within 45 days of project notification by the Department of Environmental Quality and the Virginia Marine Resources Commission or be deemed to have waived its right to provide comment.

If requested by the applicant, the Department of Environmental Quality shall convene a preapplication review panel to assist applicants for water resources projects in the early identification of issues related to the protection of beneficial instream and offstream uses of state waters. The Virginia Marine Resources Commission, the Virginia Institute of Marine Science, the Department of Wildlife Resources, the Department of Conservation and Recreation, and the Department of Environmental Quality shall participate in the preapplication review panel by providing information and guidance on the potential natural resource impacts and regulatory implications of the options being considered by the applicant. However, the participation by these agencies in such a review process shall not limit any authority they may exercise pursuant to state and federal laws or regulations.

History.

2005, c. 49; 2011, cc. 829, 842; 2020, c. 958.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 829 and 842 are identical, and added the last sentence in subsection C.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 958, in subsection B and in subsection D, substituted “Department of Wildlife Resources” for “Department of Game and Inland Fisheries.”

§ 62.1-44.15:5.02.
Low-flow protections in Potomac River.

Virginia Water Protection Permits issued after July 1, 2007, authorizing withdrawal of water from the Potomac River or its tributaries between the West Virginia border and Little Falls for any purpose other than municipal water supply, shall incorporate low-flow protection requirements if the maximum consumptive use allowed by the permit exceeds 500,000 gallons per day. Such permits shall require that the permittee provide or secure sufficient offstream storage to augment instream flow during low-flow periods in an amount equal to the amount that the permittee’s consumptive use exceeds 500,000 gallons per day. The permit shall specify the instream flow volume at which low-flow protection is to be implemented.

Permittees may comply with the requirements of this section by: (i) constructing or acquiring facilities for offstream storage of water that may be used to replace their consumptive use withdrawals exceeding 500,000 gallons per day during low-flow periods; (ii) purchasing storage capacity in facilities owned by another entity, sufficient to replace their consumptive use withdrawals exceeding 500,000 gallons per day during low-flow periods; or (iii) agreeing to a permit condition limiting consumptive use to not more than 500,000 gallons per day during low-flow periods as designated in the permit.

No owner who holds a Virginia Water Protection Permit as described in this section shall withdraw water for consumptive use in excess of 500,000 gallons per day, except in compliance with permit requirements for low-flow augmentation.

Should the implementation of emergency measures pursuant to applicable law, regulation, or interjurisdictional agreement require more stringent temporary restrictions on consumptive use, those requirements shall override the provisions of permits issued pursuant to this section during the period that such requirements are in effect.

The requirements of this section shall not apply to the reissuance or amendment of any Virginia Water Protection Permit issued prior to July 1, 2007, unless such reissuance or amendment: (i) authorizes an increase in the permitted withdrawal in excess of 500,000 gallons per day for consumptive use; or (ii) authorizes a change from nonconsumptive to consumptive use, in excess of 500,000 gallons per day.

History.

2007, c. 656.

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Environmental Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 383 (2007).

§ 62.1-44.15:5.1.
General permit for certain water quality improvement activities.

The Board shall coordinate the development of a general permit for activities such as bioengineered streambank stabilization projects and livestock stream crossings that: (i) are coverable by the Nationwide Permit Program (33 C.F.R. Part 330) of the United States Army Corps of Engineers and for which certification has not been waived by the Board; (ii) are conservation practices designed and supervised by a soil and water conservation district; (iii) meet the design standards of the Department of Conservation and Recreation and the United States Department of Agriculture’s Natural Resource Conservation Service; and (iv) are intended to improve water quality. The development of the general permit shall be exempt from Article 2 (§

2.2-4006

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act.

The development of the general permit shall be a coordinated effort between the Department of Environmental Quality, the Virginia Marine Resources Commission and such other agencies as may be needed to develop a single, unified, process that will expedite the implementation of the projects described in subsection A and unify and streamline the permitting process for such projects.

A general permit pursuant to this section shall be promulgated as final by July 1, 1998.

History.

1997, c. 845.

§ 62.1-44.15:5.2.
General permits for ready-mix concrete plant discharges.

Any general permit issued by the Board for discharges of stormwater and process wastewater from industrial activities associated with the manufacture of ready-mix concrete shall apply to both permanent and portable plants. The general permit may include a requirement that settling basins for the treatment and control of process wastewater and commingled stormwater be lined with concrete or other impermeable materials for settling basins constructed on or before February 1, 1998, and shall include such a requirement for all settling basins constructed on or after February 2, 1998.

History.

1998, c. 28.

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia environmental law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 799 (2000).